Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-319.13
Sections; cumulative.

Nothing in sections 44-319.01 to 44-319.13 shall be construed to amend, repeal, or otherwise affect the provisions of sections 44-305 and 44-821 to 44-825.

Laws 1955, c. 174, § 13, p. 501.